North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122C. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.
Article 4. Organization and System for Delivery of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services.
§ 122C-115.4.
Functions of local management entities. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Local management entities are responsible for the management and oversight of the public system of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services at the community level. An LME shall plan, develop, implement, and monitor services within a specified geographic area to ensure expected outcomes for consumers within available resources.

The primary functions of an LME are designated in this subsection and shall not be conducted by any other entity unless an LME voluntarily enters into a contract with that entity under subsection (c) of this section. The primary functions include all of the following:

Access for all citizens to the core services and administrative functions described in

G.S. 122C-2

. In particular, this shall include the implementation of a 24-hour a day, seven-day a week screening, triage, and referral process and a uniform portal of entry into care.

Provider monitoring, technical assistance, capacity development, and quality control. If at anytime the LME has reasonable cause to believe a violation of licensure rules has occurred, the LME shall make a referral to the Division of Health Service Regulation. If at anytime the LME has reasonable cause to believe the abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a client has occurred, the LME shall make a referral to the local Department of Social Services, Child Protective Services Program, or Adult Protective Services Program.

Utilization management, utilization review, and determination of the appropriate level and intensity of services. An LME may participate in the development of person centered plans for any consumer and shall monitor the implementation of person centered plans. An LME shall review and approve person centered plans for consumers who receive State-funded services and shall conduct concurrent reviews of person centered plans for consumers in the LME’s catchment area who receive Medicaid funded services.

Authorization of the utilization of State psychiatric hospitals and other State facilities. Authorization of eligibility determination requests for recipients under a CAP-MR/DD waiver.

Care coordination and quality management. This function involves individual client care decisions at critical treatment junctures to assure clients’ care is coordinated, received when needed, likely to produce good outcomes, and is neither too little nor too much service to achieve the desired results. Care coordination is sometimes referred to as “care management.” Care coordination shall be provided by clinically trained professionals with the authority and skills necessary to determine appropriate diagnosis and treatment, approve treatment and service plans, when necessary to link clients to higher levels of care quickly and efficiently, to facilitate the resolution of disagreements between providers and clinicians, and to consult with providers, clinicians, case managers, and utilization reviewers. Care coordination activities for high-risk/high-cost consumers or consumers at a critical treatment juncture include the following:

Assisting with the development of a single care plan for individual clients, including participating in child and family teams around the development of plans for children and adolescents.

Addressing difficult situations for clients or providers.

Consulting with providers regarding difficult or unusual care situations.

Ensuring that consumers are linked to primary care providers to address the consumer’s physical health needs.

Coordinating client transitions from one service to another.

Conducting customer service interventions.

Assuring clients are given additional, fewer, or different services as client needs increase, lessen, or change.

Interfacing with utilization reviewers and case managers.

Providing leadership on the development and use of communication protocols.

Participating in the development of discharge plans for consumers being discharged from a State facility or other inpatient setting who have not been previously served in the community.

Community collaboration and consumer affairs including a process to protect consumer rights, an appeals process, and support of an effective consumer and family advisory committee.

Financial management and accountability for the use of State and local funds and information management for the delivery of publicly funded services.

(7a)

Community crisis services planning in accordance with

G.S. 122C-2

02.2.

Each LME shall develop a waiting list of persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities that are waiting for specific services. The LME shall develop the list in accordance with rules adopted by the Secretary to ensure that waiting list data are collected consistently across LMEs. Each LME shall report this data annually to the Department. The data collected should include numbers of persons who are:

Waiting for residential services.

Potentially eligible for CAP-MRDD.

In need of other services and supports funded from State appropriations to or allocations from the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, including CAP-MRDD.Subject to all applicable State and federal laws and rules established by the Secretary and the Commission, nothing in this subsection shall be construed to preempt or supersede the regulatory or licensing authority of other State or local departments or divisions.

Subject to subsection (b) of this section and all applicable State and federal laws and rules established by the Secretary, an LME may contract with a public or private entity for the implementation of LME functions designated under subsection (b) of this section.

Except as provided in

G.S. 122C-124.1

and

G.S. 122C-125

, the Secretary may neither remove from an LME nor designate another entity as eligible to implement any function enumerated under subsection (b) of this section unless all of the following applies:

The LME fails during the previous consecutive three months to achieve a satisfactory outcome on any of the critical performance measures developed by the Secretary under G.S. 122C-112.1(33).

The Secretary provides focused technical assistance to the LME in the implementation of the function. The assistance shall continue for at least three months or until the LME achieves a satisfactory outcome on the performance measure, whichever occurs first.

If, after three months of receiving technical assistance from the Secretary, the LME still fails to achieve or maintain a satisfactory outcome on the critical performance measure, the Secretary shall enter into a contract with another LME or agency to implement the function on behalf of the LME from which the function has been removed.

Notwithstanding subsection (d) of this section, in the case of serious financial mismanagement or serious regulatory noncompliance, the Secretary may temporarily remove an LME function after consultation with the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services.

The Commission shall adopt rules regarding the following matters:

The definition of a high risk consumer. Until such time as the Commission adopts a rule under this subdivision, a high risk consumer means a person who has been assessed as needing emergent crisis services three or more times in the previous 12 months.

The definition of a high cost consumer. Until such time as the Commission adopts a rule under this subdivision, a high cost consumer means a person whose treatment plan is expected to incur costs in the top twenty percent (20%) of expenditures for all consumers in a disability group.

The notice and procedural requirements for removing one or more LME functions under subsection (d) of this section.

The Commission shall adopt rules to ensure that the needs of members of the active and reserve components of the Armed Forces of the United States, veterans, and their family members are met by requiring:

Each LME to have at least one trained care coordination person on staff to serve as the point of contact for TRICARE, the North Carolina National Guard’s Integrated Behavioral Health System, the Army Reserve Department of Psychological Health, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, and related organizations to ensure that members of the active and reserve components of the Armed Forces of the United States, veterans, and their family members have access to State-funded services when they are not eligible for federally funded mental health or substance abuse services.

LME staff members who provide screening, triage, or referral services to receive training to enhance the services provided to members of the active or reserve components of the Armed Forces of the United States, veterans, and their families. The training required by this subdivision shall include training on at least all of the following:

The number of persons who serve or who have served in the active or reserve components of the Armed Forces of the United States in the LME’s catchment area.

The types of mental health and substance abuse disorders that these service personnel and their families may have experienced, including traumatic brain injury, posttraumatic stress disorder, depression, substance use disorders, potential suicide risks, military sexual trauma, and domestic violence.

Appropriate resources to which these service personnel and their families may be referred as needed.

History.

2006-142, s. 4(d); 2007-323, ss. 10.49(l), (hh); 2007-484, ss. 18, 43.7(a)-(c); 2007-504, s. 1.2; 2008-107, s. 10.15(cc); 2009-186, s. 1; 2009-189, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2011-185, s. 6; 2011-291, s. 2.45; 2012-66, s. 2; 2012-83, s. 43; 2017-186, s. 2(nnnnn); 2018-33, s. 6.

Community Support Providers Appeals Process.

Session Laws
2008-107, s. 10.15A(e1)-(e4), as amended by Session Laws
2009-526, s. 2(c) and Session Laws
2009-550, s. 1.1(c), provides: “(e1) For the purpose of expediting the resolution of community support provider appeals and thereby saving State and federal funds that are paid for services that are found to be unnecessary or otherwise ineligible for payment, the Department shall implement on a temporary basis a community support provider appeals process. The process shall be a substitute for informal provider appeals at the Department level and formal provider appeals by the Office of Administrative Hearings. The community support provider appeals process shall apply to a community support services provider:

“(1) Who is aggrieved by a decision of the Department to reduce, deny, recoup, or recover reimbursement for community support services, or to deny, suspend, or revoke a provider agreement to provide community support services.

“(2) Whose endorsement has been withdrawn or whose application for endorsement has been denied by a local management entity.

“(e2) The community support provider appeals process shall be developed and implemented as follows:

“(1) A hearing under this section shall be commenced by filing a petition with the chief hearings clerk of the Department within 30 days of the mailing of the notice by the Department of the action giving rise to the contested case. The petition shall identify the petitioner, be signed by the party or representative of the party, and shall describe the agency action giving rise to the contested case. As used in this section, ‘file or filing’ means to place the paper or item to be filed into the care and custody of the chief hearings clerk of the Department and acceptance thereof by the chief hearings clerk, except that the hearing officer may permit the papers to be filed with the hearing officer, in which event the hearing officer shall note thereon the filing date. The Department shall supply forms for use in these contested cases.

“(2) If there is a timely request for an appeal, the Department shall promptly designate a hearing officer who shall hold an evidentiary hearing. The hearing officer shall conduct the hearing according to applicable federal law and regulations and shall ensure that:

“a. Notice of the hearing is given not less than 15 days before the hearing. The notice shall state the date, hour, and place of the hearing and shall be deemed to have been given on the date that a copy of the notice is mailed, via certified mail, to the address provided by the petitioner in the petition for hearing.

“b. The hearing is held in Wake County, except that the hearing officer may, take testimony and receive evidence by telephone or other electronic means. The petitioner and the petitioner’s legal representative may appear before the hearing officer in Wake County.

“c. Discovery is no more extensive or formal than that required by federal law and regulations applicable to the hearings. Prior to and during the hearing, a provider representative shall have adequate opportunity to examine the provider’s own case file. No later than five days before the date of the hearing, each party to a contested case shall identify each witness that the party intends to call.

“(3) The hearing officer shall have the power to administer oaths and affirmations and regulate the conduct of the hearing. The following shall apply to hearings held pursuant to this section:

“a. At the hearing, the parties may present such sworn evidence, law, and regulations as are relevant to the issues in the case.

“b. The petitioner and the respondent agency each have a right to be represented by a person of his choice, including an attorney obtained at the party’s own expense.

“c. The petitioner and the respondent agency shall each have the right to cross-examine witnesses as well as make a closing argument summarizing his view of the case and the law.

“d. The appeal hearing shall be recorded. If a petition for judicial review is filed the Department shall include a copy of the recording of the hearing as part of the official record. The recording of the appeal hearing may be erased or otherwise destroyed 180 days after the final decision is mailed as provided in
G.S. 108A-79(i)(5).

“(4) The hearing officer shall decide the case based upon a preponderance of the evidence, giving deference to the demonstrated knowledge and expertise of the agency as provided in
G.S. 150B-34(a). The hearing officer shall prepare a proposal for the decision, citing relevant law, regulations, and evidence, which shall be served upon the petitioner or the petitioner’s representative by certified mail, with a copy furnished to the respondent agency.

“(5) The petitioner and the respondent agency shall have 15 days from the date of the mailing of the proposal for decision to present written arguments in opposition to or in support of the proposal for decision to the designated official of the Department who will make the final decision. If neither written arguments are presented, nor extension of time granted by the final agency decision maker for good cause, within 15 days of the date of the mailing of the proposal for decision, the proposal for decision becomes final. If written arguments are presented, such arguments shall be considered and the final decision shall be rendered. The final decision shall be rendered not more than 180 days from the date of the filing of the petition. This time limit may be extended by agreement of the parties or by final agency decision maker, for good cause shown. The final decision shall be served upon the petitioner or the petitioner’s representative by certified mail, with a copy furnished to the respondent agency. In the absence of a petition for judicial review filed pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, the final decision shall be binding upon the petitioner and the Department.

“(6) A petitioner who is dissatisfied with the final decision of the Department may file, within 30 days of the service of the decision, a petition for judicial review in the Superior Court of Wake County or of the county from which the case arose. The judicial review shall be conducted according to Article 4 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

“(7) In the event of a conflict between federal law or regulations and State law or regulations, federal law or regulations shall control. This section applies to all petitions that are filed by a Medicaid community support services provider on or after July 1, 2008, and for all Medicaid community support services provider petitions that have been filed at the Office of Administrative Hearings previous to July 1, 2008, but for which a hearing on the merits has not been commenced prior to that date. The requirement that the agency decision must be rendered not more than 180 days from the date of the filing of the petition for hearing shall not apply to (i) community support services provider petitions that were filed at the Office of Administrative Hearings or (ii) requests for a hearing under the Department’s informal settlement process prior to the effective date of this act. The Office of Administrative Hearings shall transfer all cases affected by this section to the Department of Health and Human Services within 30 days of the effective date of this section. This act preempts the existing informal appeal process and reconsideration review process at the Department of Health and Human Services and the existing appeal process at the Office of Administrative Hearings with regard to all appeals filed by Medicaid community support services providers under the Medical Assistance program.

“(e3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Department of Health and Human Services may, pursuant to its statutory authority or federal Medicaid requirements, suspend the endorsement or Medicaid participation of a provider of community support services pending a final agency decision based on a fair hearing of the provider’s appeal filed with the Department under its community support provider appeal process. A provider of community support services whose endorsement, Medicaid participation, or services have been suspended is not entitled to payment during the period the appeal is pending, and the Department shall make no such payment to the provider during that period. If the final agency decision is in favor of the provider, the Department shall remove the suspension, commence payment for provider services, and reimburse the provider for payments withheld during the period of appeal. Contracts between the Department or a local management entity and the provider shall contain a provision indicating the circumstances under which a provider may appeal an agency decision and giving notice of the suspension of payments to the provider while the appeal is pending. This subsection applies to community support provider appeals pending in the Department of Health and Human Services or the Office of Administrative Hearings, as applicable, on and after July 1, 2008.

“(e4) The Department’s community support provider appeals process established under this section shall expire July 1, 2010. The Department shall report to the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, and the Fiscal Research Division on March 1, 2009, October 1, 2009, and March 1, 2010, on the effectiveness and efficiency of the community support provider appeals process.”

Session Laws
2008-107, s. 10.15A(j), provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance, shall adopt a policy reducing the maximum allowable hours for community support services to eight hours per week. This subsection does not apply to community support services offered under a Medicaid managed care, capitated at-risk waiver.”

Session Laws
2010-31, s. 10.24(a), (b), provided: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services (Department) shall select up to two additional Local Management Entities (LMEs) to implement the capitated 1915 (b)/(c) Medicaid waiver as a demonstration program during the 2010-2011 fiscal year. The waiver program shall include all Medicaid-covered mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services.
Expansion of the waiver to additional LMEs shall be contingent upon approval by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

“(b) The Department shall conduct an evaluation of the capitated 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid waiver demonstration program sites to determine the programs’ impact on consumers with developmental disabilities.
The evaluation shall include a satisfaction survey of consumers.
The Department shall consider the impact on ICF/MR facilities included in the waiver to determine and, to the extent possible, minimize potential inconsistencies with the DMA-ICF/MR rate plan and the requirements of

G.S. 131E-176

and

G.S. 131E-178

without negatively impacting the viability and success of the waiver program.
The Department shall consult with stakeholders and evaluate all other waiver options, including the possibility of a waiver without a 1915(b)/(c) combination.
The Department shall report to the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, and the Fiscal Research Division no later than April 1, 2012, after which time the Department may expand the capitated 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid waiver to additional LMEs.

“The Department shall not approve any expansion of the Piedmont Behavioral Healthcare LME (PBH) beyond its existing catchment area until after the Department has completed its evaluation and made its report pursuant to this subsection.”

Session Laws
2010-31, s. 10.24(a), (b) was repealed by Session Laws
2011-102, s. 1.

Session Laws
2011-102, s. 2, provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services shall implement additional capitated 1915(b)(c) Medicaid waivers during the 2011-2012 fiscal year through a Request for Application (RFA) process for LME applicants who prove readiness. The Department shall consult with stakeholders during the approval process. The waiver program shall include all Medicaid-covered mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services. Expansion of the waiver is contingent upon approval by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.”

Session Laws
2011-264, s. 1, as amended by Session Laws
2012-151, s. 13(a) and (b), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services (Department) shall proceed with statewide restructuring of the management responsibilities for the delivery of services for individuals with mental illness, intellectual and developmental disabilities, and substance abuse disorders through expansion of the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver. It is the intent of the General Assembly that expansion of the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver will be completed by July 1, 2013, and will result in the establishment of a system that is capable of managing all public resources that may become available for mental health, intellectual and developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services, including federal block grant funds, federal funding for Medicaid and Health Choice, and all other public funding sources. In implementing the restructuring and expansion authorized in this section, the Department shall do all of the following:

“(1) Establish accountability for the development and management of a local system that ensures easy access to care, the availability and delivery of necessary services, and continuity of care for consumers in need of mental health, intellectual and developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services.

“(2) Maintain fidelity to the Piedmont Behavioral Health (PBH) demonstration model, a proven system for the operation of all public resources for mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services.

“(3) Designate an area authority for mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services to assume responsibility for all aspects of Waiver management. The following operational models are acceptable:

“a. Merger model: A single larger LME is formed from the merger of two or more LMEs.

“b. Interlocal agreement among LMEs: A single LME is identified as the leader for all Waiver operations, financial management, and accountability for performance measures.

“(4) Use managed care strategies, including care coordination and utilization management, to reduce the trend of escalating costs in the State Medicaid program while ensuring medically necessary care and deploy a system for the allocation of resources based on the reliable assessment of intensity of need. The Department shall design these strategies to efficiently direct consumers to appropriate services and to ensure that consumers receive no more and no less than the amount of services determined to be medically necessary and at the appropriate funding level.

“(5) As the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver expands statewide, phase out the current CAP-MR/DD Waiver as well as the utilization management functions currently performed by public and private contractors.

“(6) Design the Innovations Waiver in such a way as to serve the maximum number of individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities within aggregate funding.

“(7) Require LMEs approved to operate a 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver to do all of the following:

“a. Maintain a local presence in order to respond to the unique needs and priorities of localities.

“b. Implement a process for feedback end exchange of information and ideas to ensure communication with consumers, families, providers, and stakeholders regarding disability-specific and general Waiver operations.

“c. Establish and maintain systems for ongoing communication and coordination regarding the care of individuals with mental illness, intellectual and developmental disabilities, and substance abuse disorders with other organized systems such as local departments of social services, Community Care of North Carolina, hospitals, school systems, the Department of Juvenile Justice, and other community agencies.

“d. Comply with the following operational requirements:

“1. Maintain disability specific infrastructure and competency to address the clinical, treatment, rehabilitative, habilitative, and support needs of all disabilities covered by the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver.

“2. Maintain administrative and clinical functions, including requirements for customer service, quality management, due process, provider network development, information systems, financial reporting, and staffing.

“3. Maintain full accountability for all aspects of Waiver operations and for meeting all contract requirements specified by the Department. The Department shall not require LMEs to subcontract any managed care functions or nonservice activities to other entities. However, LMEs that choose to subcontract managed care functions to other entities will be limited to the following:

“I. Information systems.

“II. Customer service (including call center) operations.

“III. Claims processing.

“IV. Provider, enrollment, credentialing, and monitoring.

“V. Professional services.

“VI. Treatment Plan development.

“VII. Referral to services.

“(b) By August 1, 2011, the Department shall select LMEs that have been assessed to meet minimum criteria for Waiver operations according to the requirements of RFA #2011-261 issued on April 1, 2011.

“(c) The Department shall require LMEs that have not been approved by the Department to operate a 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver by January 1, 2013, to merge with or be aligned through an interlocal agreement with an LME that has been approved by the Department to operate a 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver. If any LME fails to comply with this requirement, or fails to meet performance requirements of an approved contract with the Department to operate a 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver, the Department shall assign responsibility for management of the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver on behalf of the noncompliant LME to an LME that is successfully operating the Waiver and successfully meeting performance requirements of the contract with the Department. Those LMEs approved to operate the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver under an interlocal agreement must have a single LME entity designated as responsible for all aspects of Waiver operations and solely responsible for meeting contract requirements.

“(d) County governments are not financially liable for overspending or cost overruns associated with an area authority’s operation of a 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver. County governments are not financially liable for overspending or cost overruns of Medicaid services associated with a county program or multicounty program’s operation of a 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver beyond the county program or multicounty program’s Medicaid risk reserve and Medicaid fund balance amounts.

“(e) Providers of targeted case management under the CAP-MR/DD Waiver are qualified to provide the 1915(c) service known as Community Guide under the Innovations Waiver. During the first year of assuming responsibility for Waiver operations, LMEs shall offer to contract with providers that were previously approved to provide targeted case management to individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities under the CAP-MR/DD Waiver, for the provision of Community Guide services.

“(f) By December 31, 2011, the Department shall determine the feasibility of adding habilitation services to the State Medicaid Plan through the 1915(i) Option as a strategy to address the needs of Medicaid enrollees with IDD who are not enrolled in the Innovations Waiver and are not residing in an intermediate care facility for the mentally retarded (ICF-MR facility).

“(g) The Department shall consider the impact on ICF-MR facilities included in the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver to determine and, to the extent possible, minimize potential inconsistencies with the requirements of

G.S. 131E-176

and

G.S. 131E-178

without negatively impacting the viability and success of the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver programs.

“(h) The Department shall discontinue the pilot program to administer the Supports Intensity Scale to people with intellectual and developmental disabilities in non-Waiver LMEs.

“(i) The Department shall establish written policies ensuring alignment of objectives and operational coordination of the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver and the care of individuals with mental illness, intellectual and developmental disabilities, and substance abuse disorders with other organized systems under the auspices of the Department, including Community Care of North Carolina.

“(j) In the development of the budget for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium and subsequent biennia, the General Assembly shall consider a reinvestment of at least fifteen percent (15%) of the total projected State savings for that biennium from the operation of the 1915(b)/(c) Waiver, for the purpose of expanding the number of consumers served by the Innovations 1915(c) Medicaid Waiver, or for the purpose of expanding other services that are designed to meet the needs of individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

“(k) By October 1, 2011, the Department, in coordination with the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, the Division of Medical Assistance, LMEs, PBH, and with stakeholder input, shall submit to the appropriate Oversight Committee of the General Assembly a strategic plan delineating specific strategies and agency responsibilities for the achievement of the objectives and deadlines set forth in this Act.

“(
l
) The Department shall submit status reports to the General Assembly on the restructuring and expansion authorized in this section on January 1, 2012, April 1, 2012, October 1, 2012, February 1, 2013, and October 1, 2013.”

For provisions pertaining to actions by the Secretary to ensure effective management of behavioral health services under the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver, see

G.S. 122C-124.2

, as added by Session Laws
2013-85, s. 2, effective June 12, 2013.

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 12F.4A(a)-(e), as amended by Session Laws
2017-57, s. 11F.16, provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services shall require local management entities, including local management entities that have been approved to operate the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver (LME/MCOs), to implement clinical integration activities with Community Care of North Carolina (CCNC) through Total Care, a collaborative initiative designed to improve and minimize the cost of care for patients who suffer from comorbid mental health or substance abuse and primary care or other chronic conditions.

“(b) The Department shall ensure that, by no later than January 1, 2014, all LME/MCOs submit claims data, including to the extent practical, retrospective claims data and integrated payment and reporting system (IPRS) data, to the CCNC Informatics Center and to the Medicaid Management Information System. Upon receipt of this claims data, CCNC shall provide access to clinical data and care management information within the CCNC Informatics Center to LME/MCOs and authorized behavioral health providers to support (i) treatment, quality assessment, and improvement activities or (ii) coordination of appropriate and effective patient care, treatment, or habilitation.

“(c) The Department, in consultation with CCNC and the LME/MCOs, shall develop quality and performance statistics on the status of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services, including, but not limited to, variations in total cost of care, clinical outcomes, and access to and utilization of services.

“(d) The Department shall, within available appropriations and as deemed necessary by the Department, expand or alter existing contracts by mutual agreement of all parties to the contract in order to implement the provisions of this section.

“(e) Repealed by Session Laws
2017-57, s. 11F.16, effective July 1, 2017.”

Session Laws
2007-484, s. 43.7(a), repealed amendments to
G.S. 112C-115.4(b)(5) provided that House Bill 627, 2007 Regular Session [2007-504] becomes law.
Amendments to
G.S. 112C-115.4(b)(5) by Session Laws
2007-504, s. 1.2, and Session Laws
2007-323, s. 10.49(
l
), as amended by
2007-484, s. 43.7(b), are identical.

Session Laws
2008-107, s. 10.15A(b), provides: “In order to ensure accountability for services provided and funds expended for community services, the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, shall develop a tiered rate structure to replace the blended rate currently used for community support services. Under the new tiered structure, services that are necessary but do not require the skill, education, or knowledge of a qualified professional should not be paid at the same rate as services provided by qualified skilled professionals. The Department shall not implement the tiered rate structure until 15 days after it has notified the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services. The Department shall report on the development of the structure to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services not later than October 1, 2008.”

Session Laws
2008-107, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2008’.”

Session Laws
2008-107, s. 30.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2008-2009 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2008-2009 fiscal year.”

Session Laws
2008-107, s. 30.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2010-31, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2010’. ”

Session Laws
2010-31, s. 32.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2010-2011 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2010-2011 fiscal year.”

Session Laws
2010-31, s. 32.6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2011-185, s. 8(a)-(d), provides: “(a) The Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services of the Department of Health and Human Services shall, in conjunction with the Citizen Soldier Support Program, the Governor’s Focus on Servicemembers, Veterans, and Their Families, the North Carolina Division of Veterans Affairs, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, and other appropriate organizations, develop a training curriculum to be targeted at the following types of organizations:

“(1) Crisis workers, including mental health and addiction services staff on mobile crisis teams; screening, triage, and referral (STR) teams; public safety officers; crisis intervention teams (CITs); emergency management technicians (EMTs); disaster and emergency response teams; local sheriffs’ offices; and local Red Cross chapters.

“(2) Veterans service organizations and veterans service officers.

“(3) Professional advocacy and support organizations, including the National Alliance on Mental Illness North Carolina, the Traumatic Brain Injury Association of North Carolina, and other nonprofit organizations that have a mission to serve members of the active duty and reserve components, veteran members of the military, and their families.

“(4) Military chaplains.

“(b) The training curriculum shall include information about the following core issues:

“(1) The types of mental health and substance abuse disorders that service personnel and their families may have experienced, including traumatic brain injury (TBI), posttraumatic stress disorder (PTSD), military sexual trauma (MST), depression, substance use disorder (SUD), potential suicide risks, or domestic violence.

“(2) Strategies to encourage eligible veterans to enroll in and access services through the VA system, including opportunities to enroll former military members with previously undiagnosed PTSD, MST, TBI, or SUD, and those who left under less than honorable discharges into the VA system, if the reason for the discharge was due to behavioral health problems that arose or were exacerbated through military service.

“(3) Available referral sources through TRICARE, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, Military One Source, Army One Source, Defense Centers of Excellence, Deployment Health Clinical Center, the North Carolina National Guard’s Integrated Behavioral Health System, Local Management Entities, the North Carolina Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) Office of Citizen Services, North Carolina Health Info, Federally Qualified Health Centers, professional advocacy and support services, and other community resources.

“(c) That portion of the training curriculum directed towards crisis workers, professional advocacy and support organizations, and faith communities shall include information about the following:
